Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-3311
Additions; plat; vacation; recording.

The county clerk in whose office any vacated plats are recorded shall write in plain, legible letters across that part of such plat so vacated the word, vacated, and also make a reference on the plat to the volume and page in which such instrument of vacation is recorded.

Laws 1879, § 111, p. 235;

R.S.1913, § 5099;

C.S.1922, § 4272;

C.S.1929, § 17-421;

R.S.1943, § 17-422;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 17-422;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 322.